Tennessee, session 114, HB0262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (38).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee athletic commission, created by § 68-115-103;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0262
000343
- 1 -